Utah statutes.
62A-7-102.   Creation of division -- Jurisdiction.

There is created the Division of Juvenile Justice Services within the department, under the administration and supervision of the executive director, and under the policy direction of the board.  The division has jurisdiction over all youth committed to it pursuant to Section 78A-6-117.

